Utah statutes.
58-37c-14.   Emergency listing provision.
(1)  Upon a written finding of cause by the director that the listing of a
chemical as a controlled substance precursor is necessary to protect the
public health, safety, or welfare, the director may make an emergency listing
of that chemical as a controlled substance precursor by adopting a rule
pursuant to the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(2)  Such listing shall have effect until the close of the next immediately
succeeding regular session of the Legislature.  In the event the Legislature
adopts the chemical as a controlled precursor by amendment to this chapter,
the chemical shall remain listed under emergency provisions until the
effective date of the amendment.
(3)  Any violation of this chapter dealing with a controlled substance
precursor listed under the emergency listing provisions of this section shall
constitute a violation subject only to civil or administrative penalties.
